Maryland, session 2026, SB0702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–402.
(a) Regulations adopted under this subtitle shall include:
(1) The requirements for licensure of a behavioral health program,
including a requirement that the behavioral health program:
(i) 1. Establish and implement a safety plan for the safety of the
individuals served by the behavioral health program; or
2. Implement a safety or emergency plan established for the
program for another purpose; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0702*

SENATE BILL 702
(ii) Revise the safety plan not less than every 5 years;
(2) The process for a behavioral health program to apply for a license;
(3) A description of the behavioral health programs that are required to be
licensed;
(4) Any requirements for the governance of a behavioral health program,
including:
(i) A provision prohibiting a conflict of interest between the
interests of the provider and those of the individual receiving services;
(ii) A provision authorizing a behavioral health program licensed as
an outpatient mental health center to satisfy any regulatory requirement that the medical
director be on site through the use of telehealth by the director; and
(iii) A provision authorizing a psychiatric nurse practitioner to serve
as a medical director of an outpatient mental health center accredited in accordance with
COMAR 10.63.03.05, including through telehealth;
(5) Provisions for inspections of a behavioral health program, including
inspection and copying of the records of a behavioral health program in accordance with
State and federal law; [and]
(6) Provisions for denials, sanctions, suspensions, and revocations of
licenses, including imposition of civil monetary penalties, and notice and an opportunity to
be heard; AND
(7) PROVISIONS AUTHORIZING A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM TO
RELOCATE TO ANOTHER SITE, INCLUDING:
(I) A PROVISION PROVIDING AN EXPEDITED APPROVAL
PROCESS FOR THE RELOCATION OF AN EXISTING BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM
THAT IS SEPARATE FROM THE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR A NEW BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH PROGRAM;
(II) A PROVISION AUTHORIZING A RELOCATING BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH PROGRAM TO USE DOCUMENTATION PREVIOUSLY SUBMITTED TO THE
ADMINISTRATION IF THE INFORMATION IN THE DOCUMENTATION IS UNCHANGED
OR NOT RELEVANT TO THE PROCESS OF RELOCATING TO A NEW SITE;
(III) A PROVISION AUTHORIZING TEMPORARY APPROVAL FOR A
RELOCATING BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM TO BEGIN PRACTICING AT THE NEW

SENATE BILL 702 3
SITE ON A DETERMINATION OF THE ADMINISTRATION THAT THE NEW LOCATION
MEETS LIFE SAFETY STANDARDS;
(IV) A PROVISION AUTHORIZING THE ADMINISTRATION TO
CONSIDER THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM’S REGULATORY RECORD AS A BASIS
FOR STREAMLINING THE RELOCATION REVIEW AND APPROVAL PROCESS; AND
(V) A PROVISION REQUIRING THE ADMINISTRATION TO
PROVIDE CLEAR TIMELINES AND STANDARDS FOR THE RELOCATION REVIEW AND
APPROVAL PROCESS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.